Massachusetts, session 194th, H1595.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Definitions
As used in this act, the following words shall have the following meanings:
(a) "Journalist", anyone engaged in gathering, preparing, collecting, writing, editing,
filming, taping, or photographing news intended for dissemination to the public via a medium of
mass communication, including but not limited to bloggers, podcasters, authors, or credentialed
members of the media.
(b) "News", information of public interest concerning local, national, or international
events that the journalist believes is a matter of public concern.
(c) "Confidential Source", any person providing information to a journalist with the
express or implied agreement that the identity of the source will not be disclosed.
of 3

(d) "Unpublished Information", all information not communicated to the public by the
journalist, including notes, outtakes, photographs, or any other form of work product.
Section 2. Privilege
(a) Absolute Privilege for Confidential Sources. No journalist shall be compelled to
disclose in any legal proceeding the identity of any confidential source.
(b) Qualified Privilege for Unpublished Information. A journalist shall not be compelled
to disclose any unpublished information in any legal proceeding unless the party seeking such
information demonstrates:
(1) that the information is material and relevant;
(2) that the information is necessary to the resolution of the issue;
(3) that the information cannot be obtained by alternative means without undue hardship.
Section 3. Exceptions
This privilege may not be invoked if:
(a) disclosure is necessary to prevent imminent harm, including death, serious bodily
injury, or unjust incarceration.
Section 4. Applicability
This law applies to all legal proceedings, including criminal, civil, administrative, and
grand jury proceedings within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
Section 5. Protection in Criminal Proceedings
of 3

A journalist's privilege shall not be revoked solely because the journalist is accused of a
crime involving the information at issue unless the crime involves direct harm to an individual,
and the information is directly necessary to prove or disprove the criminal act, with the court
ensuring that any compelled disclosure is strictly limited to what is necessary for the
proceedings.
of 3